Maine, session 132, LD343.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §10305, sub-§1, ¶H, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 476, Pt. A,
§16, is amended to read:
H. Include energy supply and demand forecasts that must be considered in other
planning efforts including updates to the state climate action plan under Title 38,
section 577 and the Efficiency Maine Trust's triennial plan under section 10104,
subsection 4; and
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §10305, sub-§1, ¶I, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 476, Pt. A,
§16, is amended to read:
I. Identify approximate total project award targets for the next 3 competitive
solicitations to be conducted by the department pursuant to section 10313.; and
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §10305, sub-§1, ¶J is enacted to read:
J. Identify and assess emerging energy technologies, including assessing the
commercial readiness, costs and potential appropriateness of those technologies for
application in the State consistent with the department's policy and program goals
described in section 10303 prioritizing carbon-free and lowest-emission technologies.
Page 1 - 132LR0443(09)